Florida, session 2026, HB23.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
19
20 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section
21 1004.04, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
22 1004.04 Public accountability and state approval for
23 teacher preparation programs.—
24 (2) UNIFORM CORE CURRICULA AND CANDIDATE ASSESSMENT.—
25 (b) The rules to establish uniform core curricula for each
Page 1 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb23-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 23 2026
26 state-approved teacher preparation program must include, but are
27 not limited to, the following:
28 1. Candidate instruction and assessment in the Florida
29 Educator Accomplished Practices across content areas.
30 2. The use of state-adopted content standards to guide
31 curricula and instruction.
32 3. Scientifically researched and evidence-based reading
33 instructional strategies grounded in the science of reading
34 which improve reading performance for all students, including
35 explicit, systematic, and sequential approaches to teaching
36 phonemic awareness, phonics, vocabulary, fluency, and text
37 comprehension and multisensory intervention strategies. The
38 primary instructional strategy for teaching word reading is
39 phonics instruction for decoding and encoding. Instructional
40 strategies for foundational skills may not employ the three-
41 cueing system model of reading or visual memory as a basis for
42 teaching word reading. Instructional strategies may include
43 visual information and strategies that improve background and
44 experiential knowledge, add context, and increase oral language
45 and vocabulary to support comprehension, but may not be used to
46 teach word reading.
47 4. Content literacy and mathematics practices.
48 5. Strategies appropriate for the instruction of English
49 language learners.
50 6. Strategies appropriate for the instruction of students
Page 2 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb23-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 23 2026
51 with disabilities.
52 7. Strategies to differentiate instruction based on
53 student needs.
54 8. Strategies and practices to support evidence-based
55 content aligned to state standards and grading practices.
56 9. Strategies appropriate for the early identification of
57 a student in crisis or experiencing a mental health challenge
58 and the referral of such student to a mental health professional
59 for support.
60 10. Strategies to support the use of technology in
61 education and distance learning.
62 11. Strategies and practices to support effective,
63 research-based assessment and grading practices aligned to the
64 state's academic standards.
65 12. Strategies and practices on identifying, preventing,
66 preparing, addressing, and responding to mass casualty
67 incidents.
68 Section 2. Paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (3) of
69 section 1004.85, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
70 1004.85 Postsecondary educator preparation institutes.—
71 (3) Educator preparation institutes approved pursuant to
72 this section may offer competency-based certification programs
73 specifically designed for noneducation major baccalaureate
74 degree holders to enable program participants to meet the
75 educator certification requirements of s. 1012.56. An educator
Page 3 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb23-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 23 2026
76 preparation institute choosing to offer a competency-based
77 certification program pursuant to the provisions of this section
78 must implement a program developed by the institute and approved
79 by the department for this purpose. Approved programs shall be
80 available for use by other approved educator preparation
81 institutes.
82 (a) Within 90 days after receipt of a request for
83 approval, the Department of Education shall approve a
84 preparation program pursuant to the requirements of this
85 subsection or issue a statement of the deficiencies in the
86 request for approval. The department shall approve a
87 certification program if the institute provides evidence of the
88 institute's capacity to implement a competency-based program
89 that instructs and assesses each candidate in the following:
90 1.a. The Florida Educator Accomplished Practices approved
91 by the state board.
92 b. The state academic standards provided under s. 1003.41,
93 including scientifically based reading instruction, content
94 literacy, and mathematical practices, for each subject
95 identified on the statement of status of eligibility or the
96 temporary certificate.
97 c. Scientifically researched and evidence-based reading
98 instructional strategies grounded in the science of reading
99 which improve reading performance for all students, including
100 explicit, systematic, and sequential approaches to teaching
Page 4 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb23-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 23 2026
101 phonemic awareness, phonics, vocabulary, fluency, and text
102 comprehension and multisensory intervention strategies. The
103 primary instructional strategy for teaching word reading is
104 phonics instruction for decoding and encoding. Instructional
105 strategies for foundational skills may not employ the three-
106 cueing system model of reading or visual memory as a basis for
107 teaching word reading. Instructional strategies may include
108 visual information and strategies which improve background and
109 experiential knowledge, add context, and increase oral language
110 and vocabulary to support comprehension, but may not be used to
111 teach word reading.
112 d. Strategies and practices on identifying, preventing,
113 preparing, addressing, and responding to mass casualty
114 incidents.
115 2. An educational plan for each participant to meet
116 certification requirements and demonstrate his or her ability to
117 teach the subject area for which the participant is seeking
118 certification, which is based on an assessment of his or her
119 competency in the areas listed in subparagraph 1.
120 3. Field experiences appropriate to the certification
121 subject area specified in the educational plan under the
122 supervision of qualified educators. The state board shall
123 determine in rule the amount of field experience necessary to
124 serve as the teacher of record, beginning with candidates
125 entering a program in the 2023-2024 school year.
Page 5 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb23-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 23 2026
126 4. A certification ombudsman to facilitate the process and
127 procedures required for participants who complete the program to
128 meet any requirements related to the background screening
129 pursuant to s. 1012.32 and educator professional or temporary
130 certification pursuant to s. 1012.56.
131 (b) Each program participant must:
132 1. Meet certification requirements pursuant to s.
133 1012.56(1) by obtaining a statement of status of eligibility in
134 the certification subject area of the educational plan and meet
135 the requirements of s. 1012.56(2)(a)-(g) s. 1012.56(2)(a)-(f)
136 before participating in field experiences.
137 2. Demonstrate competency and participate in field
138 experiences that are appropriate to his or her educational plan
139 prepared under paragraph (a). Beginning with candidates entering
140 an educator preparation institute in the 2022-2023 school year,
141 a candidate for certification in a coverage area identified
142 pursuant to s. 1012.585(3)(f) must successfully complete all
143 competencies for a reading endorsement, including completion of
144 the endorsement practicum through the candidate's field
145 experience, in order to graduate from the program.
146 3. Before completion of the program, fully demonstrate his
147 or her ability to teach the subject area for which he or she is
148 seeking certification by documenting a positive impact on
149 student learning growth in a prekindergarten through grade 12
150 setting and, except as provided in s. 1012.56(7)(a)3., achieving
Page 6 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb23-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 23 2026
151 a passing score on the professional education competency
152 examination, the basic skills examination, and the subject area
153 examination for the subject area certification which is required
154 by state board rule.
155 Section 3. Subsections (5) and (6) of section 1012.55,
156 Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
157 1012.55 Positions for which certificates required.—
158 (5) A person who is employed as a school social worker is
159 exempt from the educator certification requirements in s.
160 1012.56(2)(h) and (i) s. 1012.56(2)(g) and (h) relating to the
161 mastery of general and subject area knowledge.
162 (6) Notwithstanding this section and ss. 1012.32 and
163 1012.56, or any other provision of law or rule to the contrary,
164 the State Board of Education shall adopt rules to allow for the
165 issuance of a classical education teaching certificate, upon the
166 request of a classical school, to any applicant who fulfills the
167 requirements of s. 1012.56(2)(a)-(g) s. 1012.56(2)(a)-(f) and
168 (11) and any other criteria established by the department. Such
169 certificate is only valid at a classical school. For the
170 purposes of this subsection, the term "classical school" means a
171 school that implements and provides professional learning in a
172 classical education school model that emphasizes the development
173 of students in the principles of moral character and civic
174 virtue through a well-rounded education in the liberal arts and
175 sciences that is based on the classical trivium stages of
Page 7 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb23-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 23 2026
176 grammar, logic, and rhetoric.
177 Section 4. Paragraphs (g), (h), and (i) of subsection (2)
178 of section 1012.56, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
179 paragraphs (h), (i), and (j), respectively, paragraphs (a), (b),
180 and (d) of subsection (7) are amended, and a new paragraph (g)
181 is added to subsection (2) of that section, to read:
182 1012.56 Educator certification requirements.—
183 (2) ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA.—To be eligible to seek
184 certification, a person must:
185 (g) Have received training that includes strategies and
186 practices on identifying, preventing, preparing, addressing, and
187 responding to mass casualty incidents.
188 (7) TYPES AND TERMS OF CERTIFICATION.—
189 (a) The Department of Education shall issue a professional
190 certificate for a period not to exceed 5 years to any applicant
191 who fulfills one of the following:
192 1. Meets all the applicable requirements outlined in
193 subsection (2).
194 2. For a professional certificate covering grades 6
195 through 12:
196 a. Meets the applicable requirements of paragraphs (2)(a)-
197 (i) (2)(a)-(h).
198 b. Holds a master's or higher degree in the area of
199 science, technology, engineering, or mathematics.
200 c. Teaches a high school course in the subject of the
Page 8 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb23-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 23 2026
201 advanced degree.
202 d. Is rated highly effective as determined by the
203 teacher's performance evaluation under s. 1012.34, based in part
204 on student performance as measured by a statewide, standardized
205 assessment or an Advanced Placement, Advanced International
206 Certificate of Education, or International Baccalaureate
207 examination.
208 e. Achieves a passing score on the Florida professional
209 education competency examination required by state board rule.
210 3. Meets the applicable requirements of paragraphs (2)(a)-
211 (i) (2)(a)-(h) and completes a professional learning
212 certification program approved by the department pursuant to
213 paragraph (8)(c) or an educator preparation institute approved
214 by the department pursuant to s. 1004.85. An applicant who
215 completes one of these programs and is rated highly effective as
216 determined by his or her performance evaluation under s. 1012.34
217 is not required to take or achieve a passing score on the
218 professional education competency examination in order to be
219 awarded a professional certificate.
220 (b) The department shall issue a temporary certificate to
221 any applicant who:
222 1. Completes the requirements outlined in paragraphs
223 (2)(a)-(g) (2)(a)-(f) and completes the subject area content
224 requirements specified in state board rule or demonstrates
225 mastery of subject area knowledge pursuant to subsection (5) and
Page 9 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb23-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 23 2026
226 holds an accredited degree or a degree approved by the
227 Department of Education at the level required for the subject
228 area specialization in state board rule;
229 2. For a subject area specialization for which the state
230 board otherwise requires a bachelor's degree, documents 48
231 months of active-duty military service with an honorable
232 discharge or a medical separation; completes the requirements
233 outlined in paragraphs (2)(a), (b), and (d)-(g) (d)-(f);
234 completes the subject area content requirements specified in
235 state board rule or demonstrates mastery of subject area
236 knowledge pursuant to subsection (5); and documents completion
237 of 60 college credits with a minimum cumulative grade point
238 average of 2.5 on a 4.0 scale, as provided by one or more
239 accredited institutions of higher learning or a nonaccredited
240 institution of higher learning identified by the Department of
241 Education as having a quality program resulting in a bachelor's
242 degree or higher; or
243 3. Is enrolled in a state-approved teacher preparation
244 program under s. 1004.04; is actively completing the required
245 program field experience or internship at a public school;
246 completes the requirements outlined in paragraphs (2)(a), (b),
247 and (d)-(g) (d)-(f); completes the subject area content
248 requirements specified in state board rule or demonstrates
249 mastery of subject area knowledge pursuant to subsection (5);
250 and documents completion of 60 college credits with a minimum
Page 10 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb23-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 23 2026
251 cumulative grade point average of 2.5 on a 4.0 scale, as
252 provided by one or more accredited institutions of higher
253 learning or a nonaccredited institution of higher learning
254 identified by the Department of Education as having a quality
255 program resulting in a bachelor's degree or higher.
256 (d) The department shall issue a temporary apprenticeship
257 certificate to any applicant who meets the requirements of
258 paragraphs (2)(a), (b), and (d)-(g) (d)-(f).
259
260 At least 1 year before an individual's temporary certificate is
261 set to expire, the department shall electronically notify the
262 individual of the date on which his or her certificate will
263 expire and provide a list of each method by which the
264 qualifications for a professional certificate can be completed.
265 Section 5. Subsection (1) of section 1012.57, Florida
266 Statutes, is amended to read:
267 1012.57 Certification of adjunct educators.—
268 (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of ss. 1012.32,
269 1012.55, and 1012.56, or any other provision of law or rule to
270 the contrary, district school boards and charter school
271 governing boards shall adopt rules to allow for the issuance of
272 an adjunct teaching certificate to any applicant who fulfills
273 the requirements of s. 1012.56(2)(a)-(g) s. 1012.56(2)(a)-(f)
274 and (11) and who has expertise in the subject area to be taught.
275 An applicant is considered to have expertise in the subject area
Page 11 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb23-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 23 2026
276 to be taught if the applicant demonstrates sufficient subject
277 area mastery through passage of a subject area test or has
278 achieved an industry certification in the subject area to be
279 taught.
280 Section 6. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 12 of 12
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb23-00